New Jersey, session 222, A102.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, if a committee, council, panel, task force, or other body, whose purposes or duties are advisory or temporary in nature, and created by an act or joint resolution does not meet or is not able to conduct business due to the lack of a quorum, at least once every 365 days, that body shall be deemed inactive.  The Secretary of State shall annually review the meeting records of every body created by an act or joint resolution and determine what body shall be deemed inactive by the provisions of this section.  If a body has been deemed inactive by the provisions of this section, the appointment of all members serving on that body shall be deemed terminated, and that body shall not be allowed to call to its assistance and avail itself of the services of employees of any State, county, or municipal department, board, bureau, commission, or agency. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.